North Carolina, session 2025, SB799.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Subsections (c) and (d) of Section 35.21 of S.L. 2017-57 are
repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective retroactively to December 31, 2020.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be used to address the increased cost to the North Carolina State Health Plan for
Teachers and State Employees as a result of the continuation of retiree medical members under
this act.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S799-v-1*